District of Columbia statutes.
7-2007

Rules.

Within 120 days of March 16, 1989, the Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue proposed rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-220, § 8, 36 DCR 550
1981 Ed., § 6-3607.
Because of the codification of D.C. Law 12-215 as subchapter II of this chapter, the designation of the preexisting text as subchapter I, “subchapter” has been substituted for “chapter” in the first sentence.